Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1291.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1504.1. Advanced transmission technologies.(a) Submission of evidence.--The following shall apply to each transmission siting application or letter of notification filed with the commission under 52 Pa. Code Ch. 57 Subch. G (relating to commission review of siting and construction of electric transmission lines):(1) An electric distribution company shall provide evidence to the commission of the electric distribution company's evaluation and assessment of implementing advanced transmission technologies on existing transmission infrastructure and all proposed transmission infrastructure 123456789101112131415161718 within the jurisdiction of the commission identified in the application or letter of notification.(2) The application or letter of notification under paragraph (1) shall not be granted, either as proposed or modified, unless the commission determines, in addition to any other existing criteria, that the proposed transmission lines incorporate all technically feasible and cost-effective advanced transmission technologies to achieve at least two of the following:(i) Avoid construction of new transmission infrastructure in whole or in part.(ii) Increase capacity, efficiency and reliability of the transmission system.(iii) Reduce transmission system congestion.(iv) Reduce environmental or aesthetic impacts.(b) Cost recovery.--Any additional costs borne by the electric distribution company in compliance with this section shall be recovered in accordance with a commission-approved tariff.(c) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the commission's authority under any other provision of law to regulate a public utility service or facility.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advanced power flow controller." A hardware or software technology that modulates circuit impedance or other electrical properties to reroute power flows and relieve congestion."Advanced transmission technologies." A software or hardware 20260SB1291PN1642 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 technology that increases the capacity, efficiency, reliability or safety of an existing or new electric transmission system, including grid-enhancing technologies such as dynamic line rating, advanced power flow controllers and topology optimization software, high-performance conductors and other technologies designed to reduce transmission congestion."Dynamic line rating." A system that uses real-time or forecasted weather and operating conditions, including wind speed and direction, to determine the transfer capacity of a transmission line."High-performance conductor." A conductor used in an electric transmission system, including carbon fiber conductors, composite core conductors and superconductors, to which the following apply:(1) The conductor has a direct electrical resistance that is at least 10% lower than aluminum-conductor steel-reinforced conductors of a similar diameter and weight.(2) The conductor has an energy carrying capacity at least 75% greater than aluminum-conductor steel-reinforced conductors of a similar diameter and weight.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1291PN1642 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021